test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-hella_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - hellá: # á-stems
   # Pelikukkoduvah stuorrâ puustuváin. 
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom: hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen: heḷá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill: heeḷán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc: helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com: helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe: heḷáttáá
    hellá+N+Ess: hellán
    hellá+N+Par: hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom: heḷáh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen: heḷái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc: helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill: helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc: heḷáin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com: heḷáiguin
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe: heḷáittáá
